Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 2
Debtors’ Remedies

§ 28-45-201. Effect of violations on rights of parties.

If a creditor has violated any provision of this act applying to collection of an excess charge or amount or enforcement of rights, subsection (4) of section 28-41-201, Idaho Code, authority to make regulated consumer loans, section 28-46-301, Idaho Code, restrictions on interests in land as security, section 28-43-309, Idaho Code, limitations on the schedule of payments or loan terms for regulated consumer loans, section 28-43-310, Idaho Code, attorney’s fees, section 28-43-311, Idaho Code, receipts, statements of account, and evidences of payment, section 28-43-204, Idaho Code, form of insurance premium loan agreement, section 28-43-205, Idaho Code, security in sales, section 28-43-301, Idaho Code, no assignments of earnings, section 28-43-304, Idaho Code, certain negotiable instruments prohibited, section 28-43-306, Idaho Code, referral sales, section 28-43-308, Idaho Code, limitations on default charges, section 28-45-301, Idaho Code, assignees subject to claims and defenses, subsection (3) of section 28-45-302, Idaho Code, or assurance of discontinuance, section 28-46-109, Idaho Code, the debtor has a cause of action to recover actual damages and also a right in an action other than a class action, to recover from the person violating this act a penalty in an amount determined by the court not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). With respect to violations arising from consumer credit sales or consumer loans made pursuant to open-end credit, no action pursuant to this subsection may be brought more than two (2) years after the violations occurred. With respect to violations arising from other regulated consumer credit transactions, no action pursuant to this subsection may be brought more than one (1) year after the scheduled or accelerated maturity of the debt.

A debtor is not obligated to pay a charge in excess of that allowed by this act and has a right of refund of any excess charge paid. A refund may be made by reducing the debtor’s obligation by the amount of the excess charge. If the debtor has paid an amount in excess of the lawful obligation under the agreement, the debtor may recover the excess amount from the person who made the excess charge or from an assignee of that person’s rights who undertakes direct collection of payments from or enforcement of rights against debtors arising from the debt.
(3) If a creditor has contracted for or received a charge in excess of that allowed by this act, or if a debtor is entitled to a refund and a person liable to the debtor refuses to make a refund within a reasonable time after demand, the debtor may recover from the creditor or the person liable in an action other than a class action a penalty in an amount determined by the court not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). With respect to excess charges arising from consumer credit sales or consumer loans made pursuant to open-end credit, no action pursuant to this subsection may be brought more than two (2) years after the violation or passage of a reasonable time for refund occurs. With respect to excess charges arising from other regulated consumer credit transactions, no action pursuant to this subsection may be brought more than one (1) year after the scheduled or accelerated maturity of the debt. For purposes of this subsection, a reasonable time is presumed to be thirty (30) days.

(4) Except as otherwise provided, a violation of this act does not impair rights on a debt.

(5) If an employer discharges an employee in violation of the provisions prohibiting discharge, section 28-45-105, Idaho Code, the employee within ninety (90) days may bring a civil action for recovery of wages lost as a result of the violation and for an order requiring reinstatement of the employee. Damages recoverable shall not exceed lost wages for six (6) weeks.

(6) A creditor is not liable for a penalty under subsection (1) or (3) of this section if he notifies the debtor of a violation before the creditor receives from the debtor written notice of the violation or the debtor has brought an action under this section, and the creditor corrects the violation within forty-five (45) days after notifying the debtor. If the violation consists of a prohibited agreement, giving the debtor a corrected copy of the writing containing the violation is sufficient notification and correction. If the violation consists of an excess charge, correction shall be made by an adjustment or refund. The administrator and any official or agency of this state having supervisory authority over a supervised financial organization shall give prompt notice to a creditor of any violation discovered pursuant to an examination or investigation of the transactions, business, records, and acts of the creditor, sections 28-46-305, 28-46-105 and 28-46-106, Idaho Code.

(7) A creditor may not be held liable in an action brought under this section for a violation of this act if the creditor shows by a preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error, notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid the error.

(8) In an action in which it is found that a creditor has violated this act, the court shall award to the debtor the costs of the action and his attorney’s fees. In determining the attorney’s fees, the amount of the recovery on behalf of the debtor is not controlling.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-201, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 2002, ch. 301, § 3, p. 858.

§ 28-45-202. Damages or penalties as setoff to obligation.

Damages or penalties to which a debtor is entitled pursuant to this part may be set off against the debtor’s obligation, and may be raised as a defense to an action on the obligation without regard to the time limitations prescribed by this part.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-202, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-45-203. Civil liability for violation of disclosure provisions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a creditor who, in violation of the provisions of the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act other than the provisions concerning advertising of credit terms, fails to disclose information to a person entitled to the information under this act is liable to that person to the same extent to which said creditor is liable to such person under the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act.

An obligor or debtor has all rights under this act that he has under the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act concerning a right of rescission as to certain transactions. A creditor or other person has all liabilities and defenses under this section that he had under the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act.

An action may not be brought under this section more than one (1) year after the date of the occurrence of the violation.

The liability of a creditor under this section is in lieu of and not in addition to his liability under the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act. An action by a person with respect to a violation may not be maintained pursuant to this section if a final judgment has been rendered for or against that person with respect to the same violation pursuant to the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act. If a final judgment has been rendered in favor of a person pursuant to this section and thereafter a final judgment with respect to the same violation is rendered in favor of the same person pursuant to the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, a creditor liable under both judgments has a cause of action against that person for appropriate relief to the extent necessary to avoid double liability with respect to the same violation.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-45-203, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.